North Dakota statutes. TITLE 25 Mental and Physical Illness or Disability
CHAPTER 25-04 Care of Developmentally Disabled

25-04-00.1.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter:

“Nonresident patient at the life skills and transition center” includes:

Any patient at the life skills and transition center who is under eighteen years old and whose responsible relative is not a bona fide resident of this state.

Any Indian patients for whom the United States government has, through its statutes and regulations, a responsibility for their care.

“Nonresident responsible relative” includes the patient’s nonresident spouse, father, or mother. It includes the bureau of Indian affairs in those cases involving Indian patients for whom the United States government has, through its statutes and regulations, a responsibility for their care.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 527, § 4; 1995, ch. 34, § 10; 2013, ch. 226, § 1.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 226, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

25-04-01.
Life skills and transition center — Name — Administration and control. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

A facility for individuals with developmental disabilities must be maintained at or near the city of Grafton in Walsh County. The facility must also be available for an individual who is determined to be an individual who may benefit from the facility’s services. The facility must be known and designated as the life skills and transition center. The department of human services has administrative authority and control of the life skills and transition center.

Source:

S.L. 1903, ch. 108, § 1; R.C. 1905, § 1160; C.L. 1913, § 1709; S.L. 1933, ch. 240, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 25-0401; S.L. 1957, ch. 197, § 3; 1957 Supp., § 25-0401; S.L. 1961, ch. 209, § 3; 1963, ch. 220, § 3; 1967, ch. 214, § 12; 1979, ch. 315, § 17; 1985, ch. 310, § 1; 1985, ch. 311, § 1; 1989, ch. 239, §§ 4, 5; 1989, ch. 338, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 294, § 1; 1995, ch. 34, § 7; 2013, ch. 226, § 1; 2015, ch. 200, § 12, effective August 1, 2015.

Cross-References.

Cruel treatment of persons admitted to state institutions a misdemeanor, see § 25-01-16.

Fees and expenses, see N.D.C.C. ch. 50-06.3.

Location at Grafton, see N.D. Const., Art. IX, § 12.

Patient may fish without license, see § 20.1-03-04.

25-04-01.
Life skills and transition center — Name — Administration and control. [Effective September 1, 2022]

A facility for individuals with developmental disabilities must be maintained at or near the city of Grafton in Walsh County. The facility must also be available for an individual who is determined to be an individual who may benefit from the facility’s services. The facility must be known and designated as the life skills and transition center. The department of health and human services has administrative authority and control of the life skills and transition center.

Source:

S.L. 1903, ch. 108, § 1; R.C. 1905, § 1160; C.L. 1913, § 1709; S.L. 1933, ch. 240, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 25-0401; S.L. 1957, ch. 197, § 3; 1957 Supp., § 25-0401; S.L. 1961, ch. 209, § 3; 1963, ch. 220, § 3; 1967, ch. 214, § 12; 1979, ch. 315, § 17; 1985, ch. 310, § 1; 1985, ch. 311, § 1; 1989, ch. 239, §§ 4, 5; 1989, ch. 338, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 294, § 1; 1995, ch. 34, § 7; 2013, ch. 226, § 1; 2015, ch. 200, § 12, effective August 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 352, § 288, effective September 1, 2022.

25-04-01.1.
Life skills and transition center to be substituted for developmental center at westwood park, Grafton.

The legislative council shall delete, where appropriate, “developmental center at westwood park, Grafton”, “developmental center”, or any derivatives of those terms, which when used in context indicate an intention to refer to those terms, wherever they appear in the North Dakota Century Code, in supplements to the North Dakota Century Code, and in the North Dakota Administrative Code, and to insert in lieu of each deletion “life skills and transition center” or an appropriate derivative of that phrase. These changes are to be made when any volume or supplement of the North Dakota Century Code is being reprinted. Life skills and transition center is to be substituted for, shall take any action previously to be taken by, and shall perform any duties previously to be performed by the developmental center at westwood park, Grafton.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 226, § 1.

25-04-02.
Purpose of life skills and transition center. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The life skills and transition center must be maintained for the relief, instruction, care, and custody of individuals with developmental disabilities or other individuals who may benefit from the services offered at the center. For this purpose the department of human services may introduce and establish such trades and manual industries as in its judgment will best prepare the residents for future self-support.

The department may provide onsite and offsite additional services and effectuate its powers and duties to best serve individuals with developmental disabilities and other individuals who may benefit from those activities. The services provided and the duties effectuated need not be accredited by the accreditation council on services for people with developmental disabilities or certified by the health care financing administration, or any other similar accrediting or certifying organization, if the service or duty is not provided to individuals with developmental disabilities or if such accrediting or certifying organization does not accredit or certify the service or duty.

Source:

S.L. 1903, ch. 108, § 4; R.C. 1905, § 1163; C.L. 1913, § 1712; R.C. 1943, § 25-0402; S.L. 1967, ch. 214, § 13; 1985, ch. 311, § 2; 1991, ch. 294, § 2; 1993, ch. 280, § 1; 1995, ch. 34, § 10; 2013, ch. 226, § 1; 2015, ch. 200, § 13, effective August 1, 2015.

25-04-02.
Purpose of life skills and transition center. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The life skills and transition center must be maintained for the relief, instruction, care, and custody of individuals with developmental disabilities or other individuals who may benefit from the services offered at the center. For this purpose the department of health and human services may introduce and establish such trades and manual industries as in its judgment will best prepare the residents for future self-support.

The department may provide onsite and offsite additional services and effectuate its powers and duties to best serve individuals with developmental disabilities and other individuals who may benefit from those activities. The services provided and the duties effectuated need not be accredited by the accreditation council on services for people with developmental disabilities or certified by the health care financing administration, or any other similar accrediting or certifying organization, if the service or duty is not provided to individuals with developmental disabilities or if such accrediting or certifying organization does not accredit or certify the service or duty.

Source:

S.L. 1903, ch. 108, § 4; R.C. 1905, § 1163; C.L. 1913, § 1712; R.C. 1943, § 25-0402; S.L. 1967, ch. 214, § 13; 1985, ch. 311, § 2; 1991, ch. 294, § 2; 1993, ch. 280, § 1; 1995, ch. 34, § 10; 2013, ch. 226, § 1; 2015, ch. 200, § 13, effective August 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 352, § 289, effective September 1, 2022.

25-04-02.1.
Accreditation of life skills and transition center. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The department of human services shall request appropriations and resources sufficient to ensure maintenance of the life skills and transition center’s accreditation by the accreditation council on services for people with developmental disabilities and certification by the health care financing administration and, if deemed necessary, by similar accrediting and certifying organizations and agencies possessing standards applicable to an individual with a developmental disability and disciplines needed to provide quality services to individuals served.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 294, § 3; 2013, ch. 226, § 1; 2017, ch. 207, § 14, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 228, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

25-04-02.1.
Accreditation of life skills and transition center. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The department of health and human services shall request appropriations and resources sufficient to ensure maintenance of the life skills and transition center’s accreditation by the accreditation council on services for people with developmental disabilities and certification by the health care financing administration and, if deemed necessary, by similar accrediting and certifying organizations and agencies possessing standards applicable to an individual with a developmental disability and disciplines needed to provide quality services to individuals served.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 294, § 3; 2013, ch. 226, § 1; 2017, ch. 207, § 14, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 228, § 1, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 352, § 290, effective September 1, 2022.

25-04-02.2.
Institutional sale of services — Budget section approval.

Subject to approval of the legislative assembly or the budget section if the legislative assembly is not in session, the life skills and transition center may provide any service not otherwise authorized by law under contract with a governmental or nongovernmental person. The life skills and transition center shall determine the rates for services provided. The legislative assembly or the budget section may approve the provision of a service under this section only after determining the service is not otherwise being provided by either the private or public sector. Any request considered by the budget section must comply with section 54-35-02.9.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 281, § 1; 1995, ch. 34, § 10; 2009, ch. 482, § 98; 2013, ch. 226, § 1; 2019, ch. 438, § 5, effective August 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 98 of chapter 482, S.L. 2009 became effective August 1, 2009.

25-04-03.
Qualifications of superintendent.

The superintendent of the life skills and transition center must be a skilled administrator with professional training and experience relating to the needs of individuals with developmental disabilities. All employees must be appointed and removed by the superintendent or by the superintendent’s designee. The salaries of all employees shall be fixed by the superintendent or the superintendent’s designee within the limits of the legislative appropriations made for such purpose.

Source:

S.L. 1903, ch. 108, § 5; R.C. 1905, § 1164; C.L. 1913, § 1713; R.C. 1943, § 25-0403; S.L. 1953, ch. 187, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 25-0403; S.L. 1963, ch. 220, § 4; 1973, ch. 226, § 1; 1979, ch. 315, § 18; 1985, ch. 311, § 3; 1989, ch. 338, § 3; 1995, ch. 34, § 10; 2013, ch. 226, § 1; 2015, ch. 200, § 14, effective August 1, 2015.

25-04-03.1.
Biennial report — Assistant superintendent. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1989, ch. 338, § 6.

25-04-04.
Who may receive benefits of life skills and transition center. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

Subject to this chapter and to any rules adopted by the department of human services, the benefits of the life skills and transition center may be received by:

Individuals with developmental disabilities and other individuals who may benefit from services provided at the life skills and transition center who, in the opinion of the superintendent of the life skills and transition center are of suitable age and capacity to receive instruction in the center and whose deficiencies prevent them from receiving proper training and instruction in the public schools;

Individuals with developmental disabilities and other individuals who may benefit from services provided at the life skills and transition center who cannot be properly cared for in their homes or other available facilities; or

Individuals with developmental disabilities and other individuals who may benefit from onsite and offsite services provided or duties effectuated by the life skills and transition center.

Residents and nonresidents of this state may receive the benefits of the life skills and transition center. Priority, however, must be given to residents of this state and first priority must be given to individuals with developmental disabilities.

Source:

S.L. 1903, ch. 108, § 6; R.C. 1905, § 1165; S.L. 1907, ch. 237, § 1; 1909, ch. 213, § 1; 1913, ch. 166, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 1714; S.L. 1917, ch. 143, § 1; 1921, ch. 64, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 1714; R.C. 1943, § 25-0404; S.L. 1957, ch. 196, § 19; 1957 Supp., § 25-0404; S.L. 1961, ch. 211, § 6; 1967, ch. 214, § 14; 1985, ch. 311, § 5; 1987, ch. 325, § 1; 1991, ch. 294, § 4; 1993, ch. 280, § 2; 1995, ch. 34, § 10; 2013, ch. 226, § 1; 2015, ch. 200, § 15, effective August 1, 2015.

Collateral References.

Change of state or national domicil of mental incompetent, 96 A.L.R.2d 1236.

25-04-04.
Who may receive benefits of life skills and transition center. [Effective September 1, 2022]

Subject to this chapter and to any rules adopted by the department of health and human services, the benefits of the life skills and transition center may be received by:

Individuals with developmental disabilities and other individuals who may benefit from services provided at the life skills and transition center who, in the opinion of the superintendent of the life skills and transition center are of suitable age and capacity to receive instruction in the center and whose deficiencies prevent them from receiving proper training and instruction in the public schools;

Individuals with developmental disabilities and other individuals who may benefit from services provided at the life skills and transition center who cannot be properly cared for in their homes or other available facilities; or

Individuals with developmental disabilities and other individuals who may benefit from onsite and offsite services provided or duties effectuated by the life skills and transition center.

Residents and nonresidents of this state may receive the benefits of the life skills and transition center. Priority, however, must be given to residents of this state and first priority must be given to individuals with developmental disabilities.

Source:

S.L. 1903, ch. 108, § 6; R.C. 1905, § 1165; S.L. 1907, ch. 237, § 1; 1909, ch. 213, § 1; 1913, ch. 166, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 1714; S.L. 1917, ch. 143, § 1; 1921, ch. 64, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 1714; R.C. 1943, § 25-0404; S.L. 1957, ch. 196, § 19; 1957 Supp., § 25-0404; S.L. 1961, ch. 211, § 6; 1967, ch. 214, § 14; 1985, ch. 311, § 5; 1987, ch. 325, § 1; 1991, ch. 294, § 4; 1993, ch. 280, § 2; 1995, ch. 34, § 10; 2013, ch. 226, § 1; 2015, ch. 200, § 15, effective August 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 352, § 291, effective September 1, 2022.

25-04-04.1.
Program management for a resident.

The department shall ensure active program management is maintained for eligible individuals residing at the life skills and transition center.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 228, § 2, effective August 1, 2019.

25-04-05.
Qualifications for admission to state facility — Screening required prior to admission or readmission — Educational or related services without charge for persons twenty-one years of age and under. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The superintendent may admit a person to the life skills and transition center when all of the following conditions have been met:

Application for admission has been made on behalf of the person by a parent or guardian or the person or agency having legal custody, or by the person seeking admission, in accordance with procedures established by the department of human services.

A comprehensive evaluation of the person has been made within three months of the date of application, a report of which has been filed with the superintendent and which, together with such other information or reviews as the department of human services may require, indicates to the superintendent’s satisfaction that the person is eligible for admission to the life skills and transition center.

The person may be admitted without exceeding the resident capacity of the facility as specified in the professional standards adopted by the department of human services.

No person may be admitted or readmitted to the life skills and transition center unless that person has undergone a screening process at the life skills and transition center to determine whether the admission or readmission is appropriate. Length of stay criteria may be established under rules as the department of human services may adopt. Any person who is suspected of being able to benefit from the services offered at the center may be screened to ascertain whether or not that person is actually a proper case for care, treatment, and training at the life skills and transition center. If in the opinion of the superintendent the person screened under this subsection is a proper subject for institutional care, treatment, and training at the life skills and transition center, that person may remain as a voluntary resident at the center at the discretion of the superintendent if all other conditions for admission required by this section are met.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, no handicapped patient, twenty-one years of age or under, or the estate or the parent of such patient, may be charged for educational or related services provided at the life skills and transition center. Except as provided in subsection 4, the department of human services has prior claim on all benefits accruing to such patients for medical and medically related services under entitlement from the federal government, medical or hospital insurance contracts, workforce safety and insurance, or medical care and disability programs. For purposes of this subsection, “related services” means transportation and such developmental, corrective, and other supportive services, as determined by the department of public instruction, as are required to assist a handicapped patient to benefit from special education. The cost of related services other than medical and medically related services must be paid by the life skills and transition center, the school district of residence of the handicapped child, and other appropriate state agencies and political subdivisions of this state. The department of public instruction, the department of human services, the school district of residence, and other appropriate state agencies and political subdivisions, as determined by the department of public instruction, shall determine and agree to that portion of related services, other than medical and medically related services, for which each agency and political subdivision is liable. The department of public instruction may adopt rules necessary to implement this section.

Parents of an individual with a developmental disability, who is twenty-one years of age or under, are not required to file, assist in filing, agree to filing, or assign an insurance claim when filing the claim would pose a realistic threat that the parents would suffer a financial loss not incurred by similarly situated parents of children with disabilities. Financial losses do not include incidental costs such as the time needed to file or assist in filing an insurance claim or the postage needed to mail the claim. Financial losses include:

A decrease in available lifetime coverage or any other benefit under an insurance policy.

An increase in premiums or the discontinuation of a policy.

An out-of-pocket expense such as the payment of a deductible amount incurred in filing a claim unless the life skills and transition center pays or waives the out-of-pocket expense.

Source:

S.L. 1903, ch. 108, § 6; R.C. 1905, § 1165; S.L. 1907, ch. 237, § 1; 1909, ch. 213, § 1; 1913, ch. 166, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 1714; S.L. 1917, ch. 143, § 1; 1921, ch. 64, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 1714; R.C. 1943, § 25-0405; S.L. 1965, ch. 205, § 1; 1967, ch. 214, § 15; 1975, ch. 245, § 1; 1979, ch. 335, § 1; 1981, ch. 223, § 2; 1985, ch. 311, § 6; 1987, ch. 325, § 2; 1991, ch. 294, § 5; 1991, ch. 295, § 1; 1995, ch. 34, § 10; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2009, ch. 12, § 19; 2013, ch. 226, § 1; 2017, ch. 207, § 15, effective August 1, 2017.

Cross-References.

Criminal Responsibility and Post-Trial Responsibility Act, see N.D.C.C. ch. 12.1-04.1.

Guardianship, see N.D.C.C. ch. 30.1-28.

Persons capable of contracting, see §§ 9-02-01, 9-02-02, 14-01-01.

Superintendent to report alien convicted of felony to United States immigration officer, see § 44-04-04.

25-04-05.
Qualifications for admission to state facility — Screening required prior to admission or readmission — Educational or related services without charge for persons twenty-one years of age and under. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The superintendent may admit a person to the life skills and transition center when all of the following conditions have been met:

Application for admission has been made on behalf of the person by a parent or guardian or the person or agency having legal custody, or by the person seeking admission, in accordance with procedures established by the department of health and human services.

A comprehensive evaluation of the person has been made within three months of the date of application, a report of which has been filed with the superintendent and which, together with such other information or reviews as the department of health and human services may require, indicates to the superintendent’s satisfaction that the person is eligible for admission to the life skills and transition center.

The person may be admitted without exceeding the resident capacity of the facility as specified in the professional standards adopted by the department of health and human services.

No person may be admitted or readmitted to the life skills and transition center unless that person has undergone a screening process at the life skills and transition center to determine whether the admission or readmission is appropriate. Length of stay criteria may be established under rules as the department of health and human services may adopt. Any person who is suspected of being able to benefit from the services offered at the center may be screened to ascertain whether or not that person is actually a proper case for care, treatment, and training at the life skills and transition center. If in the opinion of the superintendent the person screened under this subsection is a proper subject for institutional care, treatment, and training at the life skills and transition center, that person may remain as a voluntary resident at the center at the discretion of the superintendent if all other conditions for admission required by this section are met.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, no handicapped patient, twenty-one years of age or under, or the estate or the parent of such patient, may be charged for educational or related services provided at the life skills and transition center. Except as provided in subsection 4, the department of health and human services has prior claim on all benefits accruing to such patients for medical and medically related services under entitlement from the federal government, medical or hospital insurance contracts, workforce safety and insurance, or medical care and disability programs. For purposes of this subsection, “related services” means transportation and such developmental, corrective, and other supportive services, as determined by the department of public instruction, as are required to assist a handicapped patient to benefit from special education. The cost of related services other than medical and medically related services must be paid by the life skills and transition center, the school district of residence of the handicapped child, and other appropriate state agencies and political subdivisions of this state. The department of public instruction, the department of health and human services, the school district of residence, and other appropriate state agencies and political subdivisions, as determined by the department of public instruction, shall determine and agree to that portion of related services, other than medical and medically related services, for which each agency and political subdivision is liable. The department of public instruction may adopt rules necessary to implement this section.

Parents of an individual with a developmental disability, who is twenty-one years of age or under, are not required to file, assist in filing, agree to filing, or assign an insurance claim when filing the claim would pose a realistic threat that the parents would suffer a financial loss not incurred by similarly situated parents of children with disabilities. Financial losses do not include incidental costs such as the time needed to file or assist in filing an insurance claim or the postage needed to mail the claim. Financial losses include:

A decrease in available lifetime coverage or any other benefit under an insurance policy.

An increase in premiums or the discontinuation of a policy.

An out-of-pocket expense such as the payment of a deductible amount incurred in filing a claim unless the life skills and transition center pays or waives the out-of-pocket expense.

Source:

S.L. 1903, ch. 108, § 6; R.C. 1905, § 1165; S.L. 1907, ch. 237, § 1; 1909, ch. 213, § 1; 1913, ch. 166, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 1714; S.L. 1917, ch. 143, § 1; 1921, ch. 64, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 1714; R.C. 1943, § 25-0405; S.L. 1965, ch. 205, § 1; 1967, ch. 214, § 15; 1975, ch. 245, § 1; 1979, ch. 335, § 1; 1981, ch. 223, § 2; 1985, ch. 311, § 6; 1987, ch. 325, § 2; 1991, ch. 294, § 5; 1991, ch. 295, § 1; 1995, ch. 34, § 10; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2009, ch. 12, § 19; 2013, ch. 226, § 1; 2017, ch. 207, § 15, effective August 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 352, § 292, effective September 1, 2022.

25-04-05.1.
Transfer of residents — Visiting privileges — Release and placement of patients. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The superintendent shall have the right of temporary transfer of any resident of the life skills and transition center to an appropriate hospital or other specialized facility when in the superintendent’s opinion the immediate health and safety of the resident requires the transfer. The superintendent shall also have the right and responsibility of indefinite transfer of a resident from one state facility for individuals with developmental disabilities to another when the best interest of the resident will be served thereby, or when the transfer is required in conformity with the policies of the department of human services; provided, however, that no transfer may be effected until all reasonable efforts have been made to consult with the resident’s parent or guardian of the person.

Subject to reasonable rules for the orderly operation of the life skills and transition center or other state facility for individuals with developmental disabilities, any parent or guardian of the person of a resident shall have the right of visiting and communicating with a child or ward and authorizing visits and communications with others.

The superintendent may authorize the temporary release of any resident to the custody of the resident’s parent or guardian of the person, or to another person designated by the parent or such guardian. In the absence of such authorization, any parent or guardian of the person of any resident may formally request, in writing, the resident’s temporary release. The release must be granted at the earliest reasonable opportunity, but not more than thirty days after receipt of a written application. If a release is, or would be, effected contrary to the advice of the superintendent based on a recent comprehensive evaluation of the individual, the superintendent shall so advise the parent or such guardian in writing.

The superintendent may arrange for the suitable placement of a resident outside the life skills and transition center or other state facility and to release the resident on placement, provided placement has been preceded by a comprehensive evaluation. No such placement may be effected until all reasonable efforts have been made to consult with the resident’s parent or guardian of the person.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 214, § 16; 1985, ch. 311, § 7; 1991, ch. 121, § 4; 1991, ch. 326, § 76; 1995, ch. 34, § 10; 2013, ch. 226, § 1; 2015, ch. 200, § 16, effective August 1, 2015.

25-04-05.1.
Transfer of residents — Visiting privileges — Release and placement of patients. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The superintendent shall have the right of temporary transfer of any resident of the life skills and transition center to an appropriate hospital or other specialized facility when in the superintendent’s opinion the immediate health and safety of the resident requires the transfer. The superintendent shall also have the right and responsibility of indefinite transfer of a resident from one state facility for individuals with developmental disabilities to another when the best interest of the resident will be served thereby, or when the transfer is required in conformity with the policies of the department of health and human services; provided, however, that no transfer may be effected until all reasonable efforts have been made to consult with the resident’s parent or guardian of the person.

Subject to reasonable rules for the orderly operation of the life skills and transition center or other state facility for individuals with developmental disabilities, any parent or guardian of the person of a resident shall have the right of visiting and communicating with a child or ward and authorizing visits and communications with others.

The superintendent may authorize the temporary release of any resident to the custody of the resident’s parent or guardian of the person, or to another person designated by the parent or such guardian. In the absence of such authorization, any parent or guardian of the person of any resident may formally request, in writing, the resident’s temporary release. The release must be granted at the earliest reasonable opportunity, but not more than thirty days after receipt of a written application. If a release is, or would be, effected contrary to the advice of the superintendent based on a recent comprehensive evaluation of the individual, the superintendent shall so advise the parent or such guardian in writing.

The superintendent may arrange for the suitable placement of a resident outside the life skills and transition center or other state facility and to release the resident on placement, provided placement has been preceded by a comprehensive evaluation. No such placement may be effected until all reasonable efforts have been made to consult with the resident’s parent or guardian of the person.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 214, § 16; 1985, ch. 311, § 7; 1991, ch. 121, § 4; 1991, ch. 326, § 76; 1995, ch. 34, § 10; 2013, ch. 226, § 1; 2015, ch. 200, § 16, effective August 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 352, § 293, effective September 1, 2022.

25-04-05.2.
San haven — Transportation costs — Payment limited. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1989, ch. 338, § 6.

25-04-06.
Juvenile court commitment of dependent, neglected, or delinquent mentally deficient — Commitment for observation — Appeal.

In any proceeding instituted in juvenile court, the court may make an order committing the child to the life skills and transition center whenever it appears to the satisfaction of the court that the child involved in the proceeding is:

Dependent and a candidate for services at the life skills and transition center;

Neglected and a candidate for services at the life skills and transition center; or

Delinquent and a candidate for services at the life skills and transition center.

If the court is in doubt as to whether the child is a candidate for services offered at the life skills and transition center, the court may make an order committing the child to the life skills and transition center for observation only by the authorities of such institution. If it is ascertained as a result of such observation that the child is a candidate for services offered at the life skills and transition center, a report to such effect must be made by the authorities of the life skills and transition center to the court. The court thereupon shall make an order fixing a time for a hearing upon the report showing the child to be in need of these services. Notice of the hearing must be given to the parents, custodian, or guardian of such child in the manner prescribed by law for the giving of notice in other proceedings in juvenile court. Upon such hearing, the court shall make such order as it may deem proper. Any parent, custodian, guardian, or other person charged with the control of such child may take an appeal from the order made by the court in the manner now prescribed by law for the taking of appeals from decisions of the juvenile court. The procedure provided in this section is not exclusive but is in addition to other procedures provided in this chapter for the commitment of children to the life skills and transition center.

Source:

S.L. 1903, ch. 108, § 6; R.C. 1905, § 1165; S.L. 1907, ch. 237, § 1; 1909, ch. 213, § 1; 1913, ch. 166, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 1714; S.L. 1917, ch. 143, § 1; 1921, ch. 64, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 1714; R.C. 1943, § 25-0406; S.L. 1961, ch. 210, § 1; 1967, ch. 214, § 17; 1989, ch. 69, § 20; 1991, ch. 294, § 6; 1995, ch. 34, § 10; 2013, ch. 226, § 1.

Cross-References.

State Youth Authority, see N.D.C.C. ch. 27-21.

Uniform Juvenile Court Act, see N.D.C.C.
ch. 27-20.

Law Reviews.

Thoughts on the Social and Legal Nature of Deviancy and Delinquency, 31 N.D. L. Rev. 45 (1955).

25-04-07.
Disabled defendants. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 121, § 5.

25-04-08.
Discharge of resident from institution. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

A person who has been admitted as a resident must be permanently discharged within thirty days under any one of the following conditions:

The superintendent, on the basis of a comprehensive evaluation, finds that the care, treatment, training, rehabilitation, and supervision offered by the state are no longer required.

The parent or guardian who voluntarily committed the parent’s child or the guardian’s ward as a resident and who retains legal custody makes a written request for discharge.

The person is admitted on indefinite transfer to a hospital, school, or other facility, or a protective service under the jurisdiction of another state, or another agency or department of this state; provided, however, that if such admission be by contractual arrangement made by the department of human services, the person must be placed on nonresident release status, but not discharged.

A court of competent jurisdiction orders the discharge of the person.

Any person who is to be discharged under subsection 2 or 4 shall first receive a comprehensive evaluation unless such evaluation is not completed within thirty days of the request for discharge.

Source:

S.L. 1903, ch. 108, § 6; R.C. 1905, § 1165; S.L. 1907, ch. 237, § 1; 1909, ch. 213, § 1; 1913, ch. 166, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 1714; S.L. 1917, ch. 143, § 1; 1921, ch. 64, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 1714; R.C. 1943, § 25-0408; S.L. 1965, ch. 205, § 2; 1967, ch. 214, § 19; 1985, ch. 311, § 8; 1991, ch. 294, § 8.

25-04-08.
Discharge of resident from institution. [Effective September 1, 2022]

A person who has been admitted as a resident must be permanently discharged within thirty days under any one of the following conditions:

The superintendent, on the basis of a comprehensive evaluation, finds that the care, treatment, training, rehabilitation, and supervision offered by the state are no longer required.

The parent or guardian who voluntarily committed the parent’s child or the guardian’s ward as a resident and who retains legal custody makes a written request for discharge.

The person is admitted on indefinite transfer to a hospital, school, or other facility, or a protective service under the jurisdiction of another state, or another agency or department of this state; provided, however, that if such admission be by contractual arrangement made by the department of health and human services, the person must be placed on nonresident release status, but not discharged.

A court of competent jurisdiction orders the discharge of the person.

Any person who is to be discharged under subsection 2 or 4 shall first receive a comprehensive evaluation unless such evaluation is not completed within thirty days of the request for discharge.

Source:

S.L. 1903, ch. 108, § 6; R.C. 1905, § 1165; S.L. 1907, ch. 237, § 1; 1909, ch. 213, § 1; 1913, ch. 166, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 1714; S.L. 1917, ch. 143, § 1; 1921, ch. 64, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 1714; R.C. 1943, § 25-0408; S.L. 1965, ch. 205, § 2; 1967, ch. 214, § 19; 1985, ch. 311, § 8; 1991, ch. 294, § 8; 2021, ch. 352, § 294, effective September 1, 2022.

25-04-08.1.
Notification before discharge. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

Before discharge the superintendent shall consult with the parent or guardian of the person to be discharged, or with the court that ordered the commitment, and shall notify the director of the county social service board or human service zone of the county in which it is proposed that such person will assume residence and also shall notify the executive director of the department of human services.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 205, § 3; 1967, ch. 214, § 20; 1985, ch. 311, § 9; 1989, ch. 69, § 22; 1991, ch. 54, § 10; 1991, ch. 294, § 9; 2019, ch. 391, § 20, effective January 1, 2020.

25-04-08.1.
Notification before discharge. [Effective September 1, 2022]

Before discharge the superintendent shall consult with the parent or guardian of the person to be discharged, or with the court that ordered the commitment, and shall notify the director of the county social service board or human service zone of the county in which it is proposed that such person will assume residence and also shall notify the executive director of the department of health and human services.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 205, § 3; 1967, ch. 214, § 20; 1985, ch. 311, § 9; 1989, ch. 69, § 22; 1991, ch. 54, § 10; 1991, ch. 294, § 9; 2019, ch. 391, § 20, effective January 1, 2020; 2021, ch. 352, § 295, effective September 1, 2022.

25-04-09.
Expense for care of inmates to be charge upon county — County to remit to state treasurer. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1961, ch. 211, § 9.

25-04-10.
Transfer of inmate of state school when person legally responsible for support moves to another state. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1961, ch. 211, § 9.

25-04-11.
Disposition of person who is not a legal resident. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

If a person who has no legal residence in this state is subject to admission to the life skills and transition center or other appropriate state facility, by order of a court of competent jurisdiction, such person must be sent, at the expense of the county or human service zone, to the life skills and transition center in the same manner as a resident of this state who is found to be in need of services offered at the life skills and transition center, and the superintendent of the life skills and transition center shall then arrange for the transportation of such person to the place where the person belongs. The department of human services shall ascertain the place where such person belongs when the same conveniently can be done.

Source:

S.L. 1931, ch. 146, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 25-0411; S.L. 1957, ch. 196, § 20; 1957 Supp., § 25-0411; S.L. 1967, ch. 214, § 21; 1985, ch. 311, § 9; 1991, ch. 294, § 10; 1995, ch. 34, § 10; 2013, ch. 226, § 1; 2019, ch. 391, § 21, effective January 1, 2020.

Cross-References.

Fees and expenses, see N.D.C.C. ch. 50-06.3.